Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Department for Libraries and Archives

171.125.
Definitions for KRS 171.130 to 171.306.

As used in KRS

171.130

to

171.306

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Department” means the Department for Libraries and Archives;

“Public library” means a library which is established as the countywide library system by any of the methods provided by KRS Chapter 173; and

“Library materials” means those print, audiovisual, graphic, cartographic, machine readable, and manuscript materials provided by a library for its users.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 106, Art. VIII, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 157; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VIII, B, § 1; 1990, ch. 62, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Comments, Separation of Church and State: Education and Religion in Kentucky, 6 N. Ky. L. Rev. 125 (1979).

171.130.
Department for Libraries and Archives — Commissioner.

The Department for Libraries and Archives is established. The department shall be headed by a commissioner whose title shall be state librarian who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor, and who shall have had technical training in the field of library science.

History.

Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 41, § 1; 1962, ch. 106, Art. VIII, § 2; 1980, ch. 188, § 127, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 381, § 6, effective July 15, 1982.

171.140.
General powers and duties.

The department shall give assistance and advice to all state institutional and public libraries, and to all counties in the state which propose to establish public libraries, as to the best means of their establishment and operation and may send any of its members to aid in organizing such libraries or assist in the improvement of those already established.

It may receive gifts which may be used or held for the purpose given, and may purchase and operate traveling libraries under such conditions and rules as it thinks necessary to protect the interests of the state and best increase the efficiency of its service to the public.

The department may issue printed material, such as lists and circulars of information, and in the publication thereof may cooperate with other state library commissions and libraries, in order to secure the more economical administration of the work for which it was formed. It may provide for library educational opportunities in various parts of the state.

The department shall perform such other service in behalf of public libraries as it considers for the best interests of the state.

The department shall maintain a strong central collection of library materials in a variety of formats and assure access to those materials and to other information resources throughout the state and nation for the purposes of providing information and reference services to state government agencies and of supplementing the resources of local libraries.

History.

2438c-4; 1990, ch. 62, § 2, effective July 13, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The Department for Libraries and Archives does not have the power to retrieve the various copies of the Register of Births and Deaths from public libraries for no statute gives such broad supervisory authority to the Department for Libraries and Archives over local public libraries.

OAG 91-25

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Private contributions to be deposited in State Treasury, KRS

41.290

.

171.145.
Authority to provide library services for qualified readers with disabilities.

For the benefit of qualified readers with disabilities of Kentucky, the Department for Libraries and Archives may make available books and other reading matter in Braille, talking books or any other medium of reading used by qualified readers with disabilities. To this end, the department is authorized to provide library services for qualified citizens with disabilities of the Commonwealth through contract, agreement or otherwise with the Library of Congress or any regional library thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 58; 1974, ch. 8, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VIII, B, § 1; 1994, ch. 405, § 33, effective July 15, 1994.

171.150.
Power to accept money appropriated and granted.

The Department for Libraries and Archives may accept and administer any money appropriated or granted to it, in addition to appropriations to it out of the general fund, for providing, improving, and equalizing public library service, library service to state institutions, and cooperative systems of library service, including cooperative arrangements with public school, college, university, and special libraries in Kentucky, by the federal government or by the state or any other agencies.

History.

2438d-1; amend. Acts 1970, ch. 241, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The local share of the funds for an area public library, or a portion thereof, cannot be segregated from the other government funds going into the project to be supervised by the Department of Libraries (now Department for Libraries and Archives), because this would be in derogation of the supervisory authority of the Department of Libraries.

OAG 69-65

.

State law encourages the Department of Library and Archives (now Department for Libraries and Archives) to promote interstate library cooperation; therefore, participation in the Kentucky Union List of Serials, a list of the periodical magazines held by participating libraries, with libraries without the state is legally permissible.

OAG 78-23

.

171.160.
State Treasurer to be trustee of funds — Disbursements.

The State Treasurer shall serve as trustee of funds apportioned to the state from any appropriations made by the federal government, the state or any other agency for providing and equalizing public library service in Kentucky.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall, on the requisition of the department, authorize the State Treasurer to make disbursement from such funds to such libraries, cities, towns and counties for library service as have been approved and authorized to participate in the benefit of these funds under the terms of the federal acts, and for the payment of salaries and other authorized expenses out of the fund provided by the federal government.

History.

2438d-2.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Private contributions to be deposited in State Treasury, KRS

41.290

.

171.170.
Department to cooperate with federal government.

The department shall cooperate, as required by the Acts of Congress providing federal grants to states for library service, with the United States Commissioner of Education in the administration of the provisions of such Acts, employ personnel and do all things necessary to entitle the State of Kentucky to receive the benefits thereof.

History.

2438d-3.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The local share of the funds for an area public library, or a portion thereof, cannot be segregated from the other government funds going into the project to be supervised by the Department of Libraries (now Department for Libraries and Archives), because this would be in derogation of the supervisory authority of the Department of Libraries.

OAG 69-65

.

State law encourages the Department of Library and Archives (now Department for Libraries and Archives) to promote interstate library cooperation; therefore, participation in the Kentucky Union List of Serials, a list of the periodical magazines held by participating libraries, with libraries without the state is legally permissible.

OAG 78-23

.

171.180.
Reports and audits by local libraries and state officials.

All libraries, cities, towns, counties and school districts participating in or benefiting by the provisions of the federal grant for library service or receiving any service from the department, shall make such reports and audits as are required to the State Treasurer, the department, and the United States Commissioner of Education. The State Treasurer and department shall make such reports and audits as may be required by the federal government and the United States Commissioner of Education in respect to the expenditure of federal grants and progress of library service.

History.

2438d-4.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The local share of the funds for an area public library, or a portion thereof, cannot be segregated from the other government funds going into the project to be supervised by the Department of Libraries (now Department for Libraries and Archives), because this would be in derogation of the supervisory authority of the Department of Libraries.

OAG 69-65

.

171.190.
Merit system of employment to be used.

All appointments of personnel and the tenure thereof to the department and to such libraries, cities, towns, counties and school districts participating in or benefiting by the provisions of the federal grants for library service shall be based on merit without regard to political consideration.

History.

2438d-5.

171.200.
Department to administer and maintain improved cooperative and integrated system of library service.

The Department for Libraries and Archives shall make and administer plans to lessen inequalities of opportunity for library service, for the maintenance of an improved cooperative and integrated system of library service throughout the state and for suitable cooperative arrangements between public library systems, school library systems, college and university libraries, special libraries, and other appropriate state agencies. The department may contract with, or provide grants to other public or private institutions or corporations for the purpose of fulfilling the intent of this statute subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 45 and 45A.

History.

2438d-6; amend. Acts 1966, ch. 184, § 7; 1970, ch. 241, § 2; 1986, ch. 107, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

171.2001.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish a method of providing direct state aid to local public libraries in order to assure their continued existence and to enhance their services for the benefit of the citizens of the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 468, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

171.201.
Public library service appropriations — Public library services improvement and equalization fund — Purposes — Restrictions — Distribution formula.

For grants to public libraries for promoting, aiding, and equalizing public library service in Kentucky, there may be funds appropriated out of the general expenditure fund of the State Treasury.

In addition to any other funds appropriated to the Department for Libraries and Archives, there shall be appropriated annually to the department out of the general expenditure fund of the State Treasury an amount sufficient to provide the following assistance to local public libraries:

The department shall first distribute to each county public library system a foundation grant based upon the county population using the last official census as follows:

Counties with a population of twenty-two thousand (22,000) or less shall receive nine thousand dollars ($9,000);

Counties with a population between twenty-two thousand one (22,001) and forty-five thousand (45,000) shall receive eight thousand dollars ($8,000); and

Counties with a population over forty-five thousand (45,000) shall receive seven thousand dollars ($7,000); and

The department shall distribute the remaining funds appropriated for this program to each county public library system, based on the county’s share of the state population, at a rate of fifty-three cents ($0.53) per capita in fiscal year 1997-98 and seventy-three cents ($0.73) per capita in fiscal year 1998-99 and each year thereafter to be used for the following purposes:

Purchase, upgrading, and maintenance of the technology necessary to enable the staff and the public to have access to electronic information;

Purchase of library materials and equipment;

Maintenance and operation of bookmobiles and extension programs;

Staff training and compensation;

Building maintenance;

Debt service;

Resource-sharing;

Program development; and

All other local library needs and services; and

For counties which do not have a public library, the department shall make the foundation grant and per capita distribution to a recognized library organization for the purpose of providing or establishing countywide public library service under existing departmental guidelines.

The appropriation necessary to fund the formula foundation grants and a seventy-three cents ($0.73) per capita distribution shall constitute the base for the agency’s biennial budget request for this program.

In addition to the foundation grants and per capita distribution to a local public library, there is hereby created within the Department for Libraries and Archives a public library services improvement and equalization fund to assure substantially equal public library services for all citizens of the Commonwealth. The creation of this fund is not intended to limit or prevent any public library from providing services and facilities beyond those assured by the state-supported program.

It is intended that the proceeds of the fund created under this subsection be used to:

Improve early childhood development;

Support lifelong learning opportunities;

Enhance economic development;

Enrich cultural resource opportunities for all Kentuckians; and

Expand adult education and adult literacy programs.

Expenditures from the fund created in subsection (4) of this section shall not be made unless those expenditures:

Comply with the categories of allowable costs in subsection (2)(b) of this section; and

Comply with the enterprise information technology architecture and standards developed by the Commonwealth when utilized for technology procurements.

The fund created under subsection (4) of this section shall be distributed based on a formula using the per population assessment and equalization rate of two hundred percent (200%) of the poverty level per annual population assessment produced by the United States Bureau of Census. The exact formula and distribution of the fund shall be set forth in an administrative regulation promulgated by the Department for Libraries and Archives.

A local public library shall not be qualified to receive funds under subsection (4) of this section, if that library’s regular annual appropriation in the current fiscal year is less than the appropriation received in the previous fiscal year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 114, §§ 1, 5; 1966, ch. 255, § 158; 1972, ch. 223, § 1; 1974, ch. 8, § 2; 1986, ch. 468, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 173, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 490, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 504, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget,
2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, D, 6, b, (1) at 1663.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS

171.203

authorizes the expenditure of the public library service fund for the purchase of local library buildings and such expenditure must be left to the sound discretion of the State Librarian.

OAG 69-114

.

171.202.
Administration of fund.

The state librarian shall administer the provisions of KRS

171.201

to

171.205

. The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall approve expenditures of funds under these sections.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 114, § 2; 1954, ch. 41, § 2; 1962, ch. 106, Art. VIII, § 3.

Opinions of Attorney General.

KRS

171.203

authorizes the expenditure of the public library service fund for the purchase of local library buildings and such expenditure must be left to the sound discretion of the State Librarian.

OAG 69-114

.

171.203.
Expenditure of funds.

Any funds appropriated for the purpose of KRS

171.201

to

171.205

shall be expended for aiding in the establishment, extension and development of local public library services through the purchase, lease, or repair of library materials, equipment, furniture, buildings, or bookmobiles and for such other methods and services as will best accomplish the purpose. Funds shall be paid out by the State Treasurer on warrants drawn by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet on order of the state librarian.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 114, § 3; 1962, ch. 106, Art. VIII, § 4; 1964, ch. 55, § 1; 1970, ch. 241, § 3; 1990, ch. 62, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section authorizes the expenditure of the public library service fund for the purchase of local library buildings and such expenditure must be left to the sound discretion of the State Librarian.

OAG 69-114

.

171.204.
Grants in aid to public libraries — Acceptance of federal funds.

To the extent of funds available, grants may be made to qualifying public libraries based on formulas and regulations designed by the Department for Libraries and Archives or provided as special grants for an approved program. The Department for Libraries and Archives may provide partial grants or loans for constructing county or district library buildings or for improving libraries and library services of all types, through such methods and services as will best accomplish this purpose, and may accept federal funds for these purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 114, § 4; 1962, ch. 106, Art. VIII, § 5; 1964, ch. 55, § 2; 1970, ch. 241, § 4; 1990, ch. 62, § 4, effective July 13, 1990.

171.205.
Legislative intent declared.

It is the intention of KRS

171.201

to

171.205

to add to the public library service given by local communities and not to relieve such communities of their responsibilities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 114, § 6, effective June 19, 1952.

171.210.
Federal laws — Department to give notice of acceptance of.

The department shall transmit to the United States Commissioner of Education official notice of acceptance of the provisions of Acts of Congress and legislative enactment pertaining to the matters specified herein.

History.

2438d-7.

171.215.
Department to purchase textbooks for use by nonpublic school pupils in grades one through twelve.

The Department for Libraries and Archives shall purchase textbooks from publishers whose books have been adopted by the state textbook commission for distribution without cost to pupils attending grade one (1) through grade twelve (12) of the state’s nonpublic schools which have been accredited by the State Department of Education.

The chief school administrator of each eligible school may file a requisition with the state librarian for the books needed for the next ensuing school term. Textbooks eligible for distribution by grade level or subject shall conform to the schedule in use by the Kentucky Board of Education for distribution to the public schools.

The state librarian shall develop rules and regulations governing the purchase, requisition, distribution, assignment to students, care, use and return of textbooks, and a plan for permanently labeling the textbooks as the property of the Department for Libraries and Archives. The rules and regulations shall provide for the allocation of textbooks in a manner reflecting, and not to exceed the expressly limited appropriation to fund the allocation. The rules and regulations shall be developed in consultation with the Department of Education and shall conform, within statutory limits, to the rules and regulations already established by the Kentucky Board of Education.

All textbooks purchased under the provisions of this section are the property of the state. Each school administrator obtaining books through the Department for Libraries and Archives is custodian of the books in his school. He shall issue the books to the students according to the rules and regulations formulated by the state librarian.

Funds appropriated by the General Assembly to the Department for Libraries and Archives for this purpose shall not be expended for any textbooks which present a particular religious philosophy and shall not be considered as or commingled with common school funds and shall be allocated each year to the nonpublic school students as provided by rule and regulation of the Department for Libraries and Archives to the extent allowed by the appropriation provided in Acts 1978, ch. 139, sec. 2.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 139, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 362, § 6, effective July 15, 1996.

171.220.
Contracts with government agencies for establishing local library service.

The department may enter into contracts with any local, state or federal governmental agency or authority for the purpose of enabling the establishment and maintenance of a local public library service. The contracting parties may establish such districts or units of library service as they may mutually agree upon. The library service within such districts shall be carried on according to plans approved by the state librarian.

History.

2438d-8.

171.221.
Cooperative library services with other states.

The Department for Libraries and Archives is empowered to enter into an agreement with any state for the purpose of providing cooperative library services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 8, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VIII, B, § 1.

Opinions of Attorney General.

State law encourages the Department of Library and Archives (now Department for Libraries and Archives) to promote interstate library cooperation; therefore, participation in the Kentucky Union List of Serials, a list of the periodical magazines held by participating libraries, with libraries without the state is legally permissible.

OAG 78-23

.

171.223.
Delivery to Attorney General of written information concerning retention and management of public records.

The Department for Libraries and Archives shall, within sixty (60) days of June 20, 2005, and thereafter, within sixty (60) days of the effective date of any legislation amending the provisions of the Open Meetings Act, KRS

61.805

to

61.850

, or the Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

, deliver to the Office of the Attorney General written information that explains proper retention and management of public records, which information shall be included in the Office of the Attorney General’s distributions as specified in KRS

15.257

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 45, § 2, effective June 20, 2005.

171.228.
Imagination Library of Kentucky Program — Establishment — Purpose — Administration — Trust fund.

The Imagination Library of Kentucky Program is hereby established. The purpose of the program shall be to promote the development of a comprehensive statewide initiative for encouraging preschool children to develop a love of reading and learning. For purposes of this section, “state program” means the Imagination Library of Kentucky Program.

State program funds shall be used to provide, through Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library, one (1) age-appropriate book to each registered child from birth to age five (5) in participating counties. Books shall be sent monthly to each child’s home at no cost to families. The state program shall contribute the fifty percent (50%) match of the funds, if available, required of local programs participating in Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library.

The Department for Libraries and Archives shall administer the state program, including but not limited to:

Promoting the statewide development of county-level Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library programs;

Advancing and strengthening local Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library programs with the goal of increasing family enrollment in those programs;

Recruiting volunteers to assist in the development, promotion, and coordination of the state program;

Soliciting donations, gifts, and other funding to financially support the local Dolly Parton’s Imagination Library programs;

Developing community engagement;

Administering the state and local programs’ dollar matching requirements;

Coordinating the collection and remittance of local program costs for books and mailing; and

Developing statewide marketing and communication plans.

The Imagination Library of Kentucky Program trust fund is hereby created as a trust fund in the State Treasury to be administered by the Department for Libraries and Archives for the purposes set forth in this section.

The trust fund shall consist of state general fund appropriations, gifts and grants from public and private sources, and federal funds. All moneys included in the fund shall be appropriated for the purposes set forth in this section.

Any unallotted or unencumbered balances in the trust fund shall be invested as provided in KRS 42.500(9). Income earned from the investments shall be credited to the trust fund.

Notwithstanding KRS

45.229

, any fund balance at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this section.

HISTORY:

2022 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.